Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.20.025

Receipt for deposits—Contents.

Each person making a deposit in a bank shall be given a receipt that shall show or in conjunction with the deposit slip can be used to trace the name of the bank, the name of the account, the account number, the date, and the amount deposited. If specifically requested by the depositor when making the deposit, the receipt must expressly show the name of the bank, the date, the amount deposited, plus either the name of the account or the account number or both the name of the account and the account number.

[ 2014 c 37 s 191; 1985 c 305 s 2. Formerly RCW 30.20.025, 30.04.085.]